California statutes. Penal Code
 child welfare agency personnel who have been delegated the authority of county probation officers to access state summary criminal history information pursuant to Section 272 of the Welfare and Institutions Code for the purposes specified in Section 16504.5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. Information from criminal history records provided pursuant to this subdivision shall not be used for a purpose other than those specified in this section and Section 16504.5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. When an agency obtains records both on the basis of name checks and fingerprint checks, final placement decisions shall be based only on the records obtained pursuant to the fingerprint check.

(19) The court of a tribe, or court of a consortium of tribes, that has entered into an agreement with the state pursuant to Section 10553.1 of the
 Welfare and Institutions Code. This information may be used only for the purposes specified in Section 16504.5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code and for tribal approval or tribal licensing of foster care or adoptive homes. Article 6 (commencing with Section 11140) shall apply to officers, members, and employees of a tribal court receiving state summary criminal history information pursuant to this section.

(20) Child welfare agency personnel of a tribe or consortium of tribes that has entered into an agreement with the state pursuant to Section 10553.1 of the Welfare and Institutions Code and to whom the state has delegated duties under paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 272 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. The purposes for use of the information shall be for the purposes specified in Section 16504.5 of the Welfare and
 Institutions Code and for tribal approval or tribal licensing of foster care or adoptive homes. When an agency obtains records on the basis of name checks and fingerprint checks, final placement decisions shall be based only on the records obtained pursuant to the fingerprint check. Article 6 (commencing with Section 11140) shall apply to child welfare agency personnel receiving criminal record offender information pursuant to this section.

(21) An officer providing conservatorship investigations pursuant to Sections 5351, 5354, and 5356 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(22) A court investigator providing investigations or reviews in conservatorships pursuant to Section 1826, 1850, 1851, or 2250.6 of the Probate Code.

(23) A person authorized to conduct a guardianship investigation pursuant to Section 1513 of the Probate Code.

(24) A humane officer pursuant to Section 14502 of the Corporations Code for the purposes of performing the officer’s duties.

(25) A public agency described in subdivision (b) of Section 15975 of the Government Code, for the purpose of oversight and enforcement policies with respect to its contracted providers.

(26) (A) A state entity, or its designee, that receives federal tax information. A state entity or its designee that is authorized by this paragraph to receive state summary criminal history information also may transmit fingerprint images and related information to the
 Department of Justice to be transmitted to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for the purpose of the state entity or its designee obtaining federal-level criminal offender record information from the Department of Justice. This information shall be used only for the purposes set forth in Section 1044 of the Government Code.

(B) For purposes of this paragraph, “federal tax information,” “state entity” and “designee” are as defined in paragraphs (1), (2), and (3), respectively, of subdivision (f) of Section 1044 of the Government Code.

(27) The director of the State Department of State Hospitals, or their designee, for use related to research and evaluation studies described in Section 4046 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, and subject to the limitations described in that
 section.

(c) The Attorney General may furnish state summary criminal history information and, when specifically authorized by this subdivision, federal-level criminal history information upon a showing of a compelling need to any of the following, provided that when information is furnished to assist an agency, officer, or official of state or local government, a public utility, or any other entity in fulfilling employment, certification, or licensing duties, Chapter 1321 of the Statutes of 1974 and Section 432.7 of the Labor Code shall apply:

(1) A public utility, as defined in Section 216 of the Public Utilities Code, that operates a nuclear energy facility when access is needed in order to assist in employing persons to work at the facility, provided that, if the Attorney
 General supplies the data, the Attorney General shall furnish a copy of the data to the person to whom the data relates.

(2) A peace officer of the state other than those included in subdivision (b).

(3) An illegal dumping enforcement officer as defined in subdivision (i) of Section 830.7.

(4) A peace officer of another country.

(5) Public officers, other than peace officers, of the United States, other states, or possessions or territories of the United States, provided that access to records similar to state summary criminal history information is expressly authorized by a statute of the United States, other states, or possessions or territories of the
 United States if the information is needed for the performance of their official duties.

(6) A person when disclosure is requested by a probation, parole, or peace officer with the consent of the subject of the state summary criminal history information and for purposes of furthering the rehabilitation of the subject.

(7) The courts of the United States, other states, or territories or possessions of the United States.

(8) Peace officers of the United States, other states, tribes in other states, or territories or possessions of the United States.

(9) An individual who is the subject of the record requested if needed in conjunction with an application to enter the
 United States or a foreign nation.

(10) (A) (i) A public utility, as defined in Section 216 of the Public Utilities Code, or a cable corporation as defined in subparagraph (B), if receipt of criminal history information is needed in order to assist in employing current or prospective employees, contract employees, or subcontract employees who, in the course of their employment, may be seeking entrance to private residences or adjacent grounds. The information provided shall be limited to the record of convictions and arrests for which the person is released on bail or on their own recognizance pending trial.

(ii) If the Attorney General supplies the data pursuant to this paragraph, the Attorney General shall furnish a copy of the data to
 the current or prospective employee to whom the data relates.

(iii) State summary criminal history information is confidential and the receiving public utility or cable corporation shall not disclose its contents, other than for the purpose for which it was acquired. The state summary criminal history information in the possession of the public utility or cable corporation and all copies made from it shall be destroyed not more than 30 days after employment or promotion or transfer is denied or granted, except for those cases where a current or prospective employee is out on bail or on their own recognizance pending trial, in which case the state summary criminal history information and all copies shall be destroyed not more than 30 days after the case is resolved.

(iv) A violation of
 this paragraph is a misdemeanor, and shall give the current or prospective employee who is injured by the violation a cause of action against the public utility or cable corporation to recover damages proximately caused by the violations. A public utility’s or cable corporation’s request for state summary criminal history information for purposes of employing current or prospective employees who may be seeking entrance to private residences or adjacent grounds in the course of their employment shall be deemed a “compelling need” as required to be shown in this subdivision.

(v) This section shall not be construed as imposing a duty upon public utilities or cable corporations to request state summary criminal history information on current or prospective employees.

(B) For
 purposes of this paragraph, “cable corporation” means a corporation or firm that transmits or provides television, computer, or telephone services by cable, digital, fiber optic, satellite, or comparable technology to subscribers for a fee.

(C) Requests for federal-level criminal history information received by the Department of Justice from entities authorized pursuant to subparagraph (A) shall be forwarded to the Federal Bureau of Investigation by the Department of Justice. Federal-level criminal history information received or compiled by the Department of Justice may then be disseminated to the entities referenced in subparagraph (A), as authorized by law.

(11) A campus of the California State University or the University of California, or a four-year college or university accredited
 by a regional accreditation organization approved by the United States Department of Education, if needed in conjunction with an application for admission by a convicted felon to a special education program for convicted felons, including, but not limited to, university alternatives and halfway houses. Only conviction information shall be furnished. The college or university may require the convicted felon to be fingerprinted, and any inquiry to the department under this section shall include the convicted felon’s fingerprints and any other information specified by the department.

(12) A foreign government, if requested by the individual who is the subject of the record requested, if needed in conjunction with the individual’s application to adopt a minor child who is a citizen of that foreign nation. Requests for information pursuant to this
 paragraph shall be in accordance with the process described in Sections 11122 to 11124, inclusive. The response shall be provided to the foreign government or its designee and to the individual who requested the information.

(d) Whenever an authorized request for state summary criminal history information pertains to a person whose fingerprints are on file with the Department of Justice and the department has no criminal history of that person, and the information is to be used for employment, licensing, or certification purposes, the fingerprint card accompanying the request for information, if any, may be stamped “no criminal record” and returned to the person or entity making the request.

(e) Whenever state summary criminal history information is furnished as the
 result of an application and is to be used for employment, licensing, or certification purposes, the Department of Justice may charge the person or entity making the request a fee that it determines to be sufficient to reimburse the department for the cost of furnishing the information. In addition, the Department of Justice may add a surcharge to the fee to fund maintenance and improvements to the systems from which the information is obtained. Notwithstanding any other law, a person or entity required to pay a fee to the department for information received under this section may charge the applicant a fee sufficient to reimburse the person or entity for this expense. All moneys received by the department pursuant to this section, Sections 11105.3 and 26190, and former Section 13588 of the Education Code shall be deposited in a special account in the General Fund to be available for expenditure by
 the department to offset costs incurred pursuant to those sections and for maintenance and improvements to the systems from which the information is obtained upon appropriation by the Legislature.

(f) Whenever there is a conflict, the processing of criminal fingerprints and fingerprints of applicants for security guard or alarm agent registrations or firearms qualification permits submitted pursuant to Section 7583.9, 7583.23, 7596.3, or 7598.4 of the Business and Professions Code shall take priority over the processing of other applicant fingerprints.

(g) It is not a violation of this section to disseminate statistical or research information obtained from a record, provided that the identity of the subject of the record is not disclosed.

(h) It is not a violation of this section to include information obtained from a record in (1) a transcript or record of a judicial or administrative proceeding or (2) any other public record if the inclusion of the information in the public record is authorized by a court, statute, or decisional law.

(i) Notwithstanding any other law, the Department of Justice or a state or local law enforcement agency may require the submission of fingerprints for the purpose of conducting state summary criminal history information checks that are authorized by law.

(j) The state summary criminal history information shall include any finding of mental incompetence pursuant to Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 1367) of Title 10 of Part 2 arising out of a complaint charging a
 felony offense specified in Section 290.

(k) (1) This subdivision shall apply whenever state or federal summary criminal history information is furnished by the Department of Justice in accordance with federal law and as the result of an application by an authorized agency or organization and the information is to be used for peace officer employment or certification purposes. As used in this subdivision, a peace officer is defined in Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 830) of Title 3 of Part 2.

(2) Notwithstanding any other law, whenever state or federal summary criminal history information is initially furnished pursuant to paragraph (1), the Department of Justice shall disseminate the following information:

(A) Every conviction rendered against the applicant.

(B) Every arrest for an offense for which the applicant is presently awaiting trial, whether the applicant is incarcerated or has been released on bail or on their own recognizance pending trial.

(C) Every arrest or detention, except for an arrest or detention resulting in an exoneration, provided, however, that where the records of the Department of Justice do not contain a disposition for the arrest, the Department of Justice first makes a genuine effort to determine the disposition of the arrest.

(D) Every successful diversion.

(E) Every date and agency name associated with all retained peace
 officer or nonsworn law enforcement agency employee preemployment criminal offender record information search requests.

(F) Sex offender registration status of the applicant.

(G) Sentencing information, if present in the department’s records at the time of the response.

(l) (1) This subdivision shall apply whenever state or federal summary criminal history information is furnished by the Department of Justice in accordance with federal law and as the result of an application by a criminal justice agency or organization as defined in Section 13101, and the information is to be used for criminal justice employment, licensing, or certification purposes.

(2) Notwithstanding any other law, whenever state or federal summary criminal history information is initially furnished pursuant to paragraph (1), the Department of Justice shall disseminate the following information:

(A) Every conviction rendered against the applicant.

(B) Every arrest for an offense for which the applicant is presently awaiting trial, whether the applicant is incarcerated or has been released on bail or on their own recognizance pending trial.

(C) Every arrest for an offense for which the records of the Department of Justice do not contain a disposition or that did not result in a conviction, provided that the Department of Justice first makes a genuine effort to determine the disposition of the
 arrest. However, information concerning an arrest shall not be disclosed if the records of the Department of Justice indicate or if the genuine effort reveals that the subject was exonerated, successfully completed a diversion or deferred entry of judgment program, or the arrest was deemed a detention, or the subject was granted relief pursuant to Section 851.91.

(D) Every date and agency name associated with all retained peace officer or nonsworn law enforcement agency employee preemployment criminal offender record information search requests.

(E) Sex offender registration status of the applicant.

(F) Sentencing information, if present in the department’s records at the time of the response.

(m) (1) This subdivision shall apply whenever state or federal summary criminal history information is furnished by the Department of Justice in accordance with federal law and as the result of an application by an authorized agency or organization pursuant to Section 1522, 1568.09, 1569.17, or 1596.871 of the Health and Safety Code, or a statute that incorporates the criteria of any of those sections or this subdivision by reference, and the information is to be used for employment, licensing, or certification purposes.

(2) Notwithstanding any other law, whenever state or federal summary criminal history information is initially furnished pursuant to paragraph (1), the Department of Justice shall disseminate the following information:

(A) Every conviction of an offense rendered against the applicant, except a conviction for which relief has been granted pursuant to Section 1203.49.

(B) Every arrest for an offense for which the applicant is presently awaiting trial, whether the applicant is incarcerated or has been released on bail or on their own recognizance pending trial.

(C) Every arrest for an offense for which the State Department of Social Services is required by paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 1522 of the Health and Safety Code to determine if an
 applicant has been arrested. However, if the records of the Department of Justice do not contain a disposition for an arrest, the Department of Justice shall first make a genuine effort to determine the disposition of the arrest.

(D) Sex offender registration status of the applicant.

(E) Sentencing information, if present in the department’s records at the time of the response.

(3) Notwithstanding the requirements of the sections referenced in paragraph (1) of this subdivision, the Department of Justice shall not disseminate information about an arrest subsequently deemed a detention or an arrest that resulted in the successful completion of a diversion program, exoneration, or a grant of relief pursuant
 to Section 851.91.

(n) (1) This subdivision shall apply whenever state or federal summary criminal history information, to be used for employment, licensing, or certification purposes, is furnished by the Department of Justice in accordance with federal law and as the result of an application by an authorized agency, organization, or individual pursuant to any of the following:

(A) Paragraph (10) of subdivision (c), when the information is to be used by a cable corporation.

(B) Section 11105.3 or 11105.4.

(C) Section 15660 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(D) A statute that
 incorporates the criteria of any of the statutory provisions listed in subparagraph (A), (B), or (C), or of this subdivision, by reference.

(2) Notwithstanding any other law, whenever state or federal summary criminal history information is initially furnished pursuant to paragraph (1), the Department of Justice shall disseminate the following information:

(A) Every conviction, except a conviction for which relief has been granted pursuant to Section 1203.49, rendered against the applicant for a violation or attempted violation of an offense specified in subdivision (a) of Section 15660 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. However, with the exception of those offenses for which registration is required pursuant to Section 290, the Department of Justice shall not disseminate
 information pursuant to this subdivision unless the conviction occurred within 10 years of the date of the agency’s request for information or the conviction is over 10 years old but the subject of the request was incarcerated within 10 years of the agency’s request for information.

(B) Every arrest for a violation or attempted violation of an offense specified in subdivision (a) of Section 15660 of the Welfare and Institutions Code for which the applicant is presently awaiting trial, whether the applicant is incarcerated or has been released on bail or on their own recognizance pending trial.

(C) Sex offender registration status of the applicant.

(D) Sentencing information, if present in the department’s records at the
 time of the response.

(o) (1) This subdivision shall apply whenever state or federal summary criminal history information is furnished by the Department of Justice in accordance with federal law and as the result of an application by an authorized agency or organization pursuant to Section 379 or 1300 of the Financial Code or a statute that incorporates the criteria of either of those sections or this subdivision by reference, and the information is to be used for employment, licensing, or certification purposes.

(2) Notwithstanding any other law, whenever state or federal summary criminal history information is initially furnished pursuant to paragraph (1), the Department of Justice shall disseminate the following information:

(A) Every conviction rendered against the applicant for a violation or attempted violation of an offense specified in Section 1300 of the Financial Code, except a conviction for which relief has been granted pursuant to Section 1203.49.

(B) Every arrest for a violation or attempted violation of an offense specified in Section 1300 of the Financial Code for which the applicant is presently awaiting trial, whether the applicant is incarcerated or has been released on bail or on their own recognizance pending trial.

(C) Sentencing information, if present in the department’s records at the time of the response.

(p) (1) This subdivision shall
 apply whenever state or federal criminal history information is furnished by the Department of Justice in accordance with federal law and as the result of an application by an agency, organization, or individual not defined in subdivision (k), (l), (m), (n), or (o), or a statute that incorporates the criteria of that section or this subdivision by reference, and the information is to be used for employment, licensing, or certification purposes.

(2) Notwithstanding any other law, whenever state or federal summary criminal history information is initially furnished pursuant to paragraph (1), the Department of Justice shall disseminate the following information:

(A) Every conviction rendered against the applicant, except a conviction for which relief has been granted pursuant to
 Section 1203.4, 1203.4a, 1203.41, 1203.42, 1203.425, 1203.44, or 1203.49. The Commission on Teacher Credentialing, school districts, county offices of education, charter schools, private schools, state special schools for the blind and deaf, or any other entity required to have a background check because of a contract with a school district, county office of education, charter school, private school, or state special school for the blind and deaf, shall receive every conviction rendered against an applicant, retroactive to January 1, 2020, regardless of relief granted pursuant to Section 1203.4, 1203.4a, 1203.41, 1203.42, 1203.425, or 1203.49.

(B) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A) or any other law, information for a conviction for a controlled substance offense listed in Section 11350 or 11377, or former Section 11500 or 11500.5, of
 the Health and Safety Code that is more than five years old, for which relief is granted pursuant to Section 1203.4, 1203.4a, 1203.41, 1203.42, 1203.425, or 1203.49, shall not be disseminated.

(C) Every arrest for an offense for which the applicant is presently awaiting trial, whether the applicant is incarcerated or has been released on bail or on their own recognizance pending trial.

(D) Sex offender registration status of the applicant.

(E) Sentencing information, if present in the department’s records at the time of the response.

(q) All agencies, organizations, or individuals defined in subdivisions (k), (l), (m), (n), (o), and (p) may contract with the Department
 of Justice for subsequent notification pursuant to Section 11105.2. This subdivision shall not supersede sections that mandate an agency, organization, or individual to contract with the Department of Justice for subsequent notification pursuant to Section 11105.2.

(r) This section does not require the Department of Justice to cease compliance with any other statutory notification requirements.

(s) The provisions of Section 50.12 of Title 28 of the Code of Federal Regulations are to be followed in processing federal criminal history information.

(t) Whenever state or federal summary criminal history information is furnished by the Department of Justice as the result of an application by an authorized agency,
 organization, or individual defined in subdivisions (k) to (p), inclusive, and the information is to be used for employment, licensing, or certification purposes, the authorized agency, organization, or individual shall expeditiously furnish a copy of the information to the person to whom the information relates if the information is a basis for an adverse employment, licensing, or certification decision. When furnished other than in person, the copy shall be delivered to the last contact information provided by the applicant.

(u) (1) If a fingerprint-based criminal history information check is required pursuant to any statute, that check shall be requested from the Department of Justice and shall be applicable to the person identified in the referencing statute. The agency or entity identified in the statute shall
 submit to the Department of Justice fingerprint images and related information required by the Department of Justice of the types of applicants identified in the referencing statute, for the purpose of obtaining information as to the existence and content of a record of state or federal convictions and state or federal arrests and also information as to the existence and content of a record of the state or federal arrests for which the Department of Justice establishes that the person is free on bail or on their own recognizance pending trial or appeal.

(2) If requested, the Department of Justice shall transmit fingerprint images and related information received pursuant to this section to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for the purpose of obtaining a federal criminal history information check. The Department of Justice shall review
 the information returned from the Federal Bureau of Investigation, and compile and disseminate a response to the agency or entity identified in the referencing statute, pursuant to the identified subdivision. The Department of Justice shall not disseminate federal criminal history information to a private entity that is unauthorized to receive it under federal law.

(3) The Department of Justice shall provide a state response to the agency or entity identified in the referencing statute, pursuant to the identified subdivision.

(4) The agency or entity identified in the referencing statute shall request from the Department of Justice subsequent notification service, as provided pursuant to Section 11105.2, for persons described in the referencing statute.

(5) The Department of Justice shall charge a fee sufficient to cover the reasonable cost of processing the request described in this subdivision.

(6) Release of information pursuant to this subdivision is subject to the limitations of subdivision (s).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 313, Sec. 19.   (AB 2796)   Effective September 18, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

11105.001.

(a) A government entity specified in subdivision (c) may require employees, prospective employees, volunteers, contractors, and subcontractors to undergo a fingerprint-based state and national criminal history background check.

(b) A government entity specified in subdivision (c) shall submit to the Department of Justice fingerprint images and related information for individuals specified in subdivision (a) who are subject to a state and national criminal history background check, pursuant to subdivision (u) of Section 11105. The Department of Justice shall provide a state- and federal-level response pursuant to subdivision (p) of Section 11105.

(c) The following government entities are authorized pursuant to this section:

(1) The University of California, as defined in Section 9 of Article IX of the Constitution.

(2) The California State Summer School for the Arts, as defined in Section 8950 of the Education Code.

(3) The State Department of Education, for the following entities:

(A) The State Department of Education, as defined in Section 33300 of the Education Code.

(B) The California School for the Deaf, as defined in Section 59000 of the Education Code.

(C) The California School for the Blind, as defined in Section 59100 of the Education Code.

(D) Diagnostic centers, as defined in Section 59200 of the Education Code.

(4) Commission on Teacher Credentialing, as defined in Section 44210 of the Education Code.

(5) The California State University, as defined in Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 89000) of Part 55 of Division 8 of Title 3 of the Education Code.

(6) The Department of Fish and Wildlife, as defined in Section 700 of the Fish and Game Code.

(7) California Exposition and State
 Fair, as defined in Section 3301 of the Food and Agricultural Code.

(8) Exposition Park, as defined in Section 4101 of the Food and Agricultural Code.

(9) The Office of Emergency Services, as defined in Section 8585 of the Government Code.

(10) The Department of FISCal, as defined in Section 11890 of the Government Code.

(11) The Secretary of State’s Office, as defined in Section 12172.5 of the Government Code.

(12) The State Treasurer’s Office, as defined in Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 12302) of Part 2 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(13) The State Controller’s Office, as defined in Section 12402 of the Government Code.

(14) The California Health and Human Services Agency, as defined in Section 12800 of the Government Code.

(15) The California Department of Tax and Fee Administration, as defined in Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 15570) of Part 8.7 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(16) Emergency Medical Services Authority, as defined in Section 1797.100 of the Health and Safety Code.

(17) The State Department of Health Care Services, as defined in Section 100100 of the Health and Safety Code.

(18) The State Department of Public Health, as defined in Section 131050 of the Health and Safety Code.

(19) The Military Department, as defined in Section 50 of the Military and Veterans Code. The Military Department may require service members to undergo a fingerprint-based state and national criminal history background check, pursuant to subdivision (a). For purposes of this section, “service member” means a member of the active militia as defined in Section 120 of the Military and Veterans Code.

(20) The Department of Veterans Affairs, as defined in Section 63 of the Military and Veterans Code.

(21) The Department of Parks and Recreation, as defined in Section
 501 of the Public Resources Code.

(22) The Employment Development Department, as defined in Section 301 of the Unemployment Insurance Code.

(23) The California Department of Aging, as defined in Section 9100 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(24) The Housing Development and Finance Committee, as established in Section 54925 of the Health and Safety Code.

(25) The Department of Housing and Community Development, for both of the following entities:

(A) The Department of Housing and Community Development, as described in Section 50400 of the Health and Safety Code.

(B) The Housing Development and Finance Committee, as established in Section 54925 of the Health and Safety Code.

(d) The provisions of this section are severable. If any provision of this section or its application is held invalid pursuant to state or federal law, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 313, Sec. 20.   (AB 2796)   Effective September 18, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

11105.002.

(a) A government entity specified in subdivision (c) shall require specified applicants to undergo a fingerprint-based state and national criminal history background check.

(b) The government entities specified in this section shall submit to the Department of Justice fingerprint images and related information for individuals specified in subdivision (a) who are subject to a state and national criminal history background check, pursuant to subdivision (u) of Section 11105.

(c) The following government entities are authorized pursuant to this section:

(1) (A) Law enforcement agencies for peace officers and
 prospective peace officers, as designated in Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 830) of Title 3 of Part 2. The Department of Justice shall provide a state- and federal-level response pursuant to subdivision (k) of Section 11105.

(B) As used in this subdivision, “law enforcement agencies” means a police or sheriff’s department, or any department or agency of the state or any political subdivision thereof that employs any peace officer, as designated in Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 830) of Title 3 of Part 2.

(2) (A) Criminal justice agencies, as defined in Section 13101, for employees, prospective employees, volunteers, contractors, and subcontractors as specified in subparagraph (B). The Department of Justice shall provide a state- and
 federal-level response pursuant to subdivision (l) of Section 11105.

(B) This paragraph only applies to a volunteer, contractor, or subcontractor who does either of the following:

(i) Provides services for the administration of criminal justice as that term is defined in Section 20.3 of Subpart A of Part 20 of Chapter I of Title 28 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(ii) Has direct or remote access to the criminal justice agency’s systems or unescorted access to the criminal justice agency’s facilities.

(d) The provisions of this section are severable. If any provision of this section or its application is held invalid pursuant to state or federal law, that
 invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 313, Sec. 21.   (AB 2796)   Effective September 18, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

11105.003.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, any statutory requirement for an entity subject to any statutory requirement for an entity to conduct a federal criminal history information check for licensing, certification, or employment purposes does not apply if the Federal Bureau of Investigation has not authorized the entity to conduct a federal criminal history information check under the applicable federal laws and regulations.

(b) Under these circumstances, an entity may make licensing, certification, or employment decisions based on the results of a state criminal history information check until the Federal Bureau of Investigation has authorized them to conduct a
 federal criminal history information check.

(c) If the Federal Bureau of Investigation authorizes an entity to conduct the federal criminal history information check, the entity shall require an applicant, licensee, certified individual, and employee who did not previously undergo the federal criminal history information check to resubmit their fingerprints for that purpose.

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 313, Sec. 22.   (AB 2796)   Effective September 18, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

11105.01.

In addition to furnishing state summary criminal history information to the persons and entities set forth in Section 11105 and subject to the requirements and conditions set forth in that section, the Attorney General shall furnish state summary criminal history information to the Director, the Deputy Director for Security, and lottery security officers of the California State Lottery.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 55, Sec. 27.   Effective April 16, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

11105.02.

In addition to furnishing state summary criminal history information to the persons and entities set forth in Section 11105 and subject to the requirements and conditions set forth in that section, the Attorney General shall furnish state summary criminal history information upon a showing of a compelling need to any city, county, city and county, or district, or any officer or official thereof, when needed to assist in the screening of a prospective concessionaire and their affiliates or associates, as these terms are defined in subdivision (k) of Section 432.7 of the Labor Code for purposes of consenting to, or approving of, the prospective concessionaire’s application for, or acquisition of, any beneficial interest in a concession, lease, or other property interest.

Any local government’s request for state summary criminal history information for purposes of screening a prospective concessionaire and their affiliates or associates before approving or denying an application for, or acquisition of, any beneficial interest in a concession, lease, or other property interest is deemed a “compelling need” as required by this section. However, only state summary criminal history information pertaining to criminal convictions, or to arrests for offenses for which the person being screened is incarcerated or has been released on bail or on his or her own recognizance pending trial, may be obtained pursuant to this section.

Any information obtained from the state summary criminal history information is confidential and the receiving local government shall not disclose its contents, other than for the purpose for which it was acquired. The state summary criminal history information in the possession of the local government and all copies made from it shall be destroyed not more than 30 days after the local government’s final decision to grant or deny consent to, or approval of, the prospective concessionaire’s application for, or acquisition of, a beneficial interest in a concession, lease, or other property interest. Nothing in this section shall be construed as imposing any duty upon a local government, or any officer or official thereof, to request state summary criminal history information on any current or prospective concessionaire or the affiliates or associates of that concessionaire.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 627, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

11105.03.
